src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-aajlek_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ájlek: # N_ODD (no alternations except final 'devoicing')
    ájlek+N+Sg+Nom: ájlek
    ájlek+N+Sg+Gen: ájlega
    ájlek+N+Sg+Acc: ájlegav
    ájlek+N+Sg+Ill: ájlegij
    ájlek+N+Sg+Ine: ájlegin
    ájlek+N+Sg+Ela: [ájlegist, ájlegis]
    ájlek+N+Sg+Com: ájlegijn
    ájlek+N+Pl+Nom: ájlega
    ájlek+N+Pl+Gen: ájlegij
    ájlek+N+Pl+Acc: ájlegijt
    ájlek+N+Pl+Ill: ájlegijda
    ájlek+N+Pl+Ine: ájlegijn
    ájlek+N+Pl+Ela: [ájlegijst, ájlegijs]
    ájlek+N+Pl+Com: [ájlegij, ájlegijgum]
    ájlek+N+Ess: ájlegin
    ájlek+N+Abe: ájlegahtá

 
 
